Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF370.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin INCOME TAX HOLIDAY; DIRECT SUPPORT PROFESSIONALS.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, and before January 1, 2027, an individual who is an eligible direct support professional may elect to receive an exemption from the individual income tax under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 290. new text end new text begin (b) An eligible direct support professional who is eligible for a refundable credit in excess of the individual's liability for tax may still file and claim a return for a taxable year covered by this section. new text end new text begin (c) For the purposes of this section, "eligible direct support professional" means an individual who: new text end new text begin (1) was an employee, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 290.92, subdivision 1, clause (3), of an eligible facility in Minnesota during the taxable year; new text end new text begin (2) worked at least 1,000 hours at an eligible facility in Minnesota during the taxable year; and new text end new text begin (3) had adjusted gross income during the taxable year that did not exceed $75,000, or $150,000 for a married taxpayer filing a joint return. new text end new text begin (d) For the purposes of this section, "eligible facility" means: new text end new text begin (1) a nursing facility, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 256R.02, subdivision 33; new text end new text begin (2) an assisted living facility, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 144G.08, subdivision 7; new text end new text begin (3) an adult foster care licensed under Minnesota Rules, parts 9555.5105 to 9555.6265; new text end new text begin (4) a community residential setting, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 245D.02, subdivision 4a; or new text end new text begin (5) intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental disabilities licensed under Minnesota Statutes, sections 144.50 to 144.56. new text end new text begin (e) The definitions in Minnesota Statutes, section 290.01, apply for this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, and before January 1, 2027. new text end